Vermont, session 2025-2026, H575.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 181 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 181. SURVIVORS AND DISABILITY BENEFITS FOR THE
SURVIVORS OF EMERGENCY PERSONNEL
§ 3171. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the Emergency Personnel Survivors Benefit and
Disability Benefits Review Board.
VT LEG #386028 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.575
2026 Page 2 of 7
(2) “Child” means a natural or legally adopted child, regardless of age.
(3) “Emergency personnel” means:
(A) firefighters as defined in subdivision 3151(3) of this title; and
(B) emergency medical personnel and volunteer personnel as defined
in 24 V.S.A. § 2651; and
(C) law enforcement officers who have been certified by the Vermont
Criminal Justice Council pursuant to section 2358 of this title.
(4) “Line of duty” means:
(A) answering or returning from with respect to firefighters,
emergency personnel, and volunteer personnel:
(i) service in answer to a call of the department or service for a
fire or emergency, including going to and returning from a fire or emergency
or participating in a fire or emergency training drill; or
(B)(ii) similar service in another town or district to which the
department or service has been called for firefighting or emergency purposes.;
and
(B) with respect to law enforcement officers:
(i) service as a law enforcement officer in answer to a complaint
lodged with the department or in response to a disorder, including going to,
returning from, and investigating or responding to the complaint or disorder; or
VT LEG #386028 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.575
2026 Page 3 of 7
(ii) service under orders from the department or in any emergency
for which the law enforcement officer serves as a law enforcement officer.
(5) “Occupation-related illness” means a disease that directly arises out
of, and in the course of, service, including a heart injury or disease
symptomatic within 72 hours from the date of last service in the line of duty,
which shall be presumed to be incurred in the line of duty.
(6) “Parent” means a natural or adoptive parent.
(7) “Permanent total disability” means a disability as defined in 21
V.S.A. § 644.
(8) “Survivor” means a spouse, child, or parent of deceased emergency
personnel.
§ 3172. EMERGENCY PERSONNEL SURVIVORS BENEFIT AND
DISABILITY BENEFITS REVIEW BOARD
(a)(1) There is created the Emergency Personnel Survivors Benefit and
Disability Benefits Review Board, which shall consist of the State Treasurer or
designee, the Attorney General or designee, the Chief Fire Service Training
Officer of the Vermont Fire Service Training Council or designee, the
Executive Director of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council or designee, and
one member of the public to represent the interests of emergency personnel
appointed by the Governor for a term of two years.
VT LEG #386028 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.575
2026 Page 4 of 7
(2) Survivors of emergency personnel, employed by or who volunteer
for the State of Vermont, a county or municipality of the State, or a nonprofit
entity that provides services in the State, who die in the line of duty or of an
occupation-related illness may request the Board award a monetary benefit
under section 3173 of this title.
(3) Emergency personnel, employed by or who volunteer for the State of
Vermont, a county or municipality of the State, or a nonprofit entity that
provides services in the State, who suffer a permanent total disability in the
line of duty may request the Board award a monetary benefit under section
3173 of this title. An award of a monetary benefit under section 3173 of this
title shall not diminish or otherwise impair any other benefit that the disabled
emergency personnel is entitled to receive under any other State or federal law.
(4) The Board shall be responsible for determining whether to award
monetary benefits under section 3173 of this title. A decision to award
monetary benefits shall be made by unanimous vote of the Board and shall be
made within 60 days after the receipt of all information necessary to enable the
Board to determine eligibility.
(5) The Board may request any information necessary for the exercise of
its duties under this section. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Board
from initiating the investigation or determination of a claim before being
VT LEG #386028 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.575
2026 Page 5 of 7
requested by a survivor, a disabled emergency personnel, or employer of
emergency personnel.
(b) Within 10 days after the Board has reached its decision, it shall notify
the named survivors or the disabled emergency personnel of its decision by
certified mail. If the Board denies the claim, the named survivors or the
disabled emergency personnel shall have 60 days from the date of receiving
the denial to file an appeal with the Superior Court in the county in which the
deceased or the disabled emergency personnel was employed or was an
authorized volunteer.
(c) If the Board decides to award a monetary benefit, the benefit shall be
paid to the disabled emergency personnel or to the surviving spouse or, if the
emergency personnel had no spouse at the time of death, to the surviving child,
or equally among surviving children. If the deceased emergency personnel is
not survived by a spouse or child, the benefit shall be paid to a surviving
parent, or equally between surviving parents. If the deceased emergency
personnel is not survived by a spouse, children, or parents, the Board shall not
award a monetary benefit under this chapter.
(d) Upon a Board decision to award a monetary benefit under this chapter,
the Treasurer shall make payment to the beneficiaries as described in
subsection (c) of this section.
VT LEG #386028 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.575
2026 Page 6 of 7
(e) The State Treasurer’s office shall provide staff, office space, and any
other reasonable and necessary resources to the Board.
(f) The member of the public appointed by the Governor shall be entitled to
per diem compensation authorized under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for each day spent
in the performance of his or her the member’s duties.
§ 3173. MONETARY BENEFIT
(a) The survivors of emergency personnel who dies die while in the line of
duty or from an occupation-related illness and emergency personnel who suffer
a permanent total disability in the line of duty may apply for a payment of
$80,000.00 from the State.
* * *
§ 3175. EMERGENCY PERSONNEL SURVIVORS BENEFIT AND
DISABILITY BENEFITS SPECIAL FUND
(a) The Emergency Personnel Survivors Benefit and Disability Benefits
Special Fund is established in the Office of the State Treasurer for the purpose
of the payment of claims distributed pursuant to this chapter. The Fund shall
comprise appropriations made by the General Assembly, amounts transferred
by the Emergency Board when the General Assembly is not in session, and
contributions or donations from any other source. All balances in the Fund at
the end of the fiscal year shall be carried forward. Interest earned shall remain
in the Fund.
VT LEG #386028 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.575
2026 Page 7 of 7
(b) [Repealed.]
(c) In the event that the balance of the Fund is insufficient to pay monetary
benefits awarded by the Board when the General Assembly is not in session,
the Emergency Board may, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 133, transfer into the Fund
additional amounts necessary to pay the monetary benefits.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386028 v.1